Georgia, session 2025_26, SB104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 29 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to information
technology relative to state government, is amended by adding a new article to read as
follows:
"ARTICLE 3
50-29-30.
As used in this article, the term:
S. B. 104
- 1 -

LC 61 0100
(1) 'Agency' means the State of Georgia and any branch, department, agency, division,
board, bureau, entity, official, employee, or agent of the state and any county,
municipality, school district, consolidated government, or authority created by or
pursuant to the Constitution of the State of Georgia or any general or local law of this
state and any official, employee, or agent of any such entity.
(2) 'Artificial intelligence system' means an engineered or machine based system that
emulates the capability of a person to receive audio, visual, text, or any other form of
information and use the information received to emulate a human cognitive process,
including, but not limited to, learning, generalizing, reasoning, planning, predicting,
acting, or communicating; provided, however, that artificial intelligence systems may
vary in the forms of information they can receive and in the human cognitive processes
they can emulate.
50-29-31.
No agency shall install or use any artificial intelligence system on state equipment if the
company that developed or deployed such artificial intelligence system is directly or
indirectly owned or operated by the People's Republic of China or is domiciled in, has its
principal place of business in, has headquarters in, or is organized under the laws of the
People's Republic of China."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 104
- 2 -